District of Columbia statutes.
42-3305

Exclusiveness of remedy.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the tenant of such apartment house from pursuing any other action or remedy at law or equity that it may have against the owner, agent, lessor, manager or company.

Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-94, § 6, 27 DCR 3500
1981 Ed., § 43-545.